California statutes. Water Code
(c) The Attorney General shall represent the board, or any affected regional water quality control board, or both the board and the regional board, and the state in litigation concerning affairs of the board, or a regional board, or both, unless the Attorney General represents another state agency that is a party to the action. In that case, the Attorney General may represent the board, the regional board, or both, with the written consent of the board and the other state agency, the board may contract for the services of private counsel to represent the board, the regional board, or both, subject to Section 11040 of the Government Code, or the legal counsel of the board may represent the board, the regional board, or both. Sections 11041, 11042, and 11043 of the Government Code are not applicable to the board. The legal counsel of the board shall advise and furnish legal services, except
 representation in litigation, to the regional boards upon their request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 4.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

187.

The board, regional water quality control boards, the Department of Water Resources, and other state agencies shall, to the fullest extent possible, exchange records, reports, material, and any other information relating to water, water rights, water pollution or quality, or any areas of mutual concern, to the end that unnecessary duplication of effort may be avoided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

188.

The board may expend money appropriated for the administration of the laws the administration of which is committed to the board.

Such expenditures by the board shall be made in accordance with law in carrying on the work for which the appropriations were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

188.5.

The board shall publish biennial progress reports relating to the activities of the board and California regional water quality control boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

189.

(a) There is hereby established the Office of Sustainable Water Solutions within the state board, which may be administered by the state board as a separate organizational unit or within the state board’s divisions or offices.

(b) The purpose of the office is to promote permanent and sustainable drinking water and wastewater treatment solutions to ensure the effective and efficient provision of safe, clean, affordable, and reliable drinking water and wastewater treatment services. In furtherance of this purpose, the office may take, but is not limited to, all of the following actions:

(1) Coordinating with and providing assistance to small drinking water systems, wastewater treatment
 systems, and disadvantaged communities without drinking water or wastewater treatment systems.

(2) Promoting and facilitating regional drinking water and wastewater projects.

(3) Promoting and facilitating regional solutions, including consolidation of existing water districts, expansion of existing water districts to serve communities unserved by public water systems and wastewater treatment systems, and extension of services to underserved communities and disadvantaged communities.

(4) Advancing the delivery of affordable, safe drinking water to disadvantaged communities throughout the state.

(5) Providing technical assistance to disadvantaged communities and small drinking water systems and wastewater systems, including grant application assistance,
 outreach and education in vulnerable communities, financial management support, and facilitation of discussions within and between communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (AB 92)   Effective March 27, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

189.3.

(a) The board, in consultation with the regional water quality control boards, and the Division of the State Architect within the Department of General Services shall recommend best design and use practices for storm water and dry weather runoff capture practices that can generally be applied to all new, reconstructed, or altered public schools, including school grounds.

(b) The board shall submit the recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2019.

(c) The board and the State Department of Education shall post the recommendations on their respective Internet Web sites on or before March 1, 2019.

(d) For
 purposes of this section, “storm water and dry weather runoff capture practices” means practices to control water pollutants, pollutant loads, and water runoff volume exiting a site to the maximum extent feasible by minimizing impervious surface area and controlling runoff from impervious surfaces through infiltration, evapotranspiration, bioretention, treatment, and rainfall harvest.

(e) (1) The reporting requirement pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be inoperative on January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 214.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

189.5.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Low-Income Water Rate Assistance Act.

(b) No later than January 1, 2018, the board, in collaboration with the State Board of Equalization and relevant stakeholders, shall develop a plan for the funding and implementation of the Low-Income Water Rate Assistance Program, which shall include all of the following elements:

(1) A description of the method for collecting moneys to support and
 implement the program, including a discussion of any constitutional restrictions on public water agency ratesetting.

(2) A description of the mechanism for providing funding assistance under the program through either direct credits to enrollees in the program or reimbursements to water service providers, including a method for verifying income eligibility of low-income ratepayers, clarification of the role of the Public Utilities Commission and water utilities in determining and verifying customer eligibility, and recommendations regarding the
 structure of the program, particularly whether it will be administered by the state or locally administered.

(3) A description of the method to be used to determine the amount of moneys that may need to be collected from water ratepayers to fund the program. The plan shall include a set of recommendations and best practices of cost-savings measures to ensure water utilities are demonstrating whether and how they are keeping rates low. This section does not authorize the imposition of a state charge to fund the program.

(c) In developing the plan required in subdivision (b), the board may consider the existing rate assistance programs authorized by the Public Utilities Commission for investor-owned water utilities pursuant to Section 739.8 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) The plan may also include recommendations for other cost-effective methods of offering assistance to low-income water customers besides rate assistance, including billing alternatives, installation of water conservation devices, and leak repair. In considering other methods, the board may consider the Public Utilities Commission’s “Assessment of Water Utility Low-Income Assistance Programs.”

(e) (1) No later than February 1,
 2018, the board shall report to the Legislature on its findings regarding the feasibility, financial stability, and desired structure of the program, including any recommendations for legislative action that may need to be taken.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on February 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Board” means
 the State Water Resources Control Board.

(2) “Low-income” means a household with income that is equal to or no greater than 200 percent of the federal poverty guideline level. For one-person households, program eligibility shall be based on two-person household guideline levels.

(3) “Program” means the Low-Income Water Rate Assistance Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

189.7.

(a) Outreach to identify issues of environmental justice needs to begin as early as possible in state board or regional board planning, policy, and permitting processes. The state board and each regional board shall do both of the following:

(1) Engage in equitable, culturally relevant community outreach to
 promote meaningful civil engagement from potentially impacted communities of proposed discharges of waste
 that may have disproportionate impacts on water quality in disadvantaged communities or tribal communities and ensure that outreach and engagement shall continue throughout the waste discharge planning, policy, and permitting processes.

(2) Contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature in the
 annual Budget Act for this purpose, hire environmental justice and tribal community coordinator positions solely dedicated to the purpose of achieving, at a minimum, all of the following goals:

(A) Adhering to environmental justice goals, policies, and objectives.

(B) Promoting meaningful civic engagement in the public decisionmaking process.

(C) Informing water quality control plans and state policies for water quality control, and amendments thereto, and statewide, regional, and individual waste discharge requirements or waivers of waste discharge requirements that address
 water quality impacts that occur disproportionately in disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 13149.2.

(D) Soliciting community recommendations for future projects to be listed on regional board supplemental environmental project lists.

(b) Contingent upon a specific appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or other statute for these purposes, the state board shall do all of the following:

(1) Direct resources for training of state board and regional board staff to advance adherence to environmental justice objectives, goals, and policies adopted by the state board and the regional boards.

(2) Establish a community capacity-building stipend program to promote meaningful civic engagement by disadvantaged communities and tribal communities in the state board and regional board decisionmaking processes by providing funding or services that allow members of the public to overcome barriers, such as technology, language, travel, and income, to public participation.

(3) Develop program-specific tools to better identify and prioritize state board and regional board compliance assessment and enforcement actions in disadvantaged communities.

(c) The state board may, through contracts or grants, utilize nonprofit organizations organized for the purpose of addressing environmental justice issues in disadvantaged communities or that work closely with tribal communities to
 administer all or part of the activities specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Disadvantaged community”
 means a community in which the median household income is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income level.

(2) “Environmental justice” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30107.3 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) “Meaningful civic engagement” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing opportunities for people to participate in decisionmaking processes about activities that may affect their environment or health and to contribute to the state board’s and regional boards’ decisionmaking.

(B) Seeking out and facilitating the involvement of people potentially affected by the
 decisions and taking into account community concerns.

(C) Informing disadvantaged and tribal community members of opportunities to be appointed to advisory or decisionmaking bodies, thereby empowering those community members to become advisors or decisionmakers.

(4) “Tribal community” means a community within a federally recognized California Native American tribe or nonfederally recognized Native American tribe on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 347, Sec. 2.   (AB 2108)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State Representation on Regional Water Resources Commissions [190. - 190.]

190.

Whenever the State of California is specifically invited by federal law to participate in any interstate commission to plan for the regional development of water and related resources, the Governor shall appoint each California member of such commission. The appointment of each such member shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate, and the member appointed shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The provisions of this section shall also apply to the Western States Water Council established by the Western Governors’ Conference at its meeting in Portland, Oregon, in June 1965.

Each member appointed by the Governor to the Western States Water Council shall receive the actual and necessary expenses incurred by him in the performance of his duties as a member, including travel expenses. Additionally, each such member, except persons who are officers or employees of the state, shall receive a compensation of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day such member is engaged in the performance of his duties as a member. Such expenses and compensation shall be paid from the budget of the Department of Water Resources.

The provisions of this section do not in any manner affect the provisions of Section 123 which provide for state administration of interstate compacts relative to the distribution and use of the waters of any interstate streams or bodies of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Miscellaneous Powers of Department [205. - 347.]



  ARTICLE 1. Participation in Associations [205. - 205.]

205.

The department may join associations of representatives of other States which have been established for not less than 10 years and which have for their purpose the promotion of reclamation and irrigation and cooperation between the several States and the Federal Government in matters relating to reclamation and irrigation. The department may collaborate and cooperate with other members of the association selected in accordance with the constitution and by-laws of such association, relative to matters of public interest to the State within the scope of the activities of such association. The department may, from any of its funds available for the purpose, make expenditures for the pro rata share of the expenses of such association attributable to California and for the services performed by such association for the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Surveys, Investigations, and Distribution of Water [225. - 238.]

225.

The department may carry on topographic surveys and investigations into matters pertaining to the water resources of the State along the lines of hydrography, hydroeconomics, and the use and distribution of water for agricultural purposes, and to that end, where possible and to the best interest of the State, shall enter into contracts for cooperation with the different departments of the Federal Government. The department, with the consent of the Governor, may maintain and continue such surveys and investigations where there is available money not covered by cooperative contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

The department, either independently or in co-operation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, may do any of the following:

(a) Conduct investigations of all or any portion of any stream, stream system, lake or other body of water.

(b) Investigate either or both surface and underground water conditions.

(c) Collect records of diversion and use of water.

(d) Supervise distribution of water in accordance with agreements and court orders therefor.

(e) Conduct investigations of the rate of use of water for various purposes and considering various soil conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2090.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

The department may investigate any natural situation available for reservoirs or reservoir systems for gathering and distributing flood or other water not under beneficial use in any stream, stream system, lake, or other body of water. The department may ascertain the feasibility of projects for such reservoirs or reservoir systems, the supply of water that may thereby be made available, and the extent and character of the areas that may be thereby irrigated. The department may estimate the cost of such projects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

The department shall gather and correlate information and data pertinent to an annual forecast of seasonal water crop, including the making of snow surveys, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, State, Federal, or other agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

The department, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, to the extent that funds are allocated therefor, shall investigate conditions of the quality of all waters within the state, including saline waters, coastal and inland, as related to all sources of pollution of whatever nature. The department may recommend any steps which might be taken to improve or protect the quality of such waters. The department shall coordinate its investigations fully with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 711, Sec. 120.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

The department, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, or upon the request of the State Water Resources Control Board, to the extent funds are allocated therefor, shall conduct surveys and investigations relating to the reclamation of water from wastes for beneficial purposes, including but not limited to the determination of quantities of such water presently wasted, and possibilities of use of such water for recharge of underground storage or for agricultural or industrial uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 711, Sec. 121.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

The department, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, state, federal or other agency, shall investigate and survey conditions of damage to quality of underground waters, which conditions are or may be caused by improperly constructed, abandoned or defective wells through the interconnection of strata or the introduction of surface waters into underground waters. The department shall report to the appropriate California regional water quality control board its recommendations for minimum standards of well construction in any particular locality in which it deems regulation necessary to protection of quality of underground water, and shall report to the Legislature from time to time, its recommendations for proper sealing of abandoned wells.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

No plans or proposal for authorization of a project for construction or operation by the State shall be submitted to the Legislature by the Department of Water Resources unless the plans or proposal includes (1) the comments and recommendations, if any, of the Department of Fish and Game and (2) provision for any water or facilities necessary for public recreation and the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources that the Department of Water Resources determines to be justifiable in terms of statewide interest, and feasible, as a nonreimbursable cost of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2047.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

The department, either independently or in co-operation with or through any person or any county, state, federal or other agency, is authorized to investigate, excavate, and preserve any historic or prehistoric ruin or monument, or any object of antiquity, situated in areas to be used for state water development purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 806.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

The department, either independently or in co-operation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, to the extent that funds are allocated therefor, may conduct a program of study, research, experimentation, and evaluation in the field of weather modification, including the production and control of rainfall by artificial means, and it may contract with public and private organizations and persons for research relative thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

The department, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, is authorized to collect hydrologic data necessary for river forecasting, to make forecasts of stream flow, to provide for flood warning, and to provide for communication necessary for the collection and dissemination of such information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1291.)
-------------------------------------------

238.

(a) The department shall conduct studies of the Sacramento River and the Feather River and their tributaries north of Sacramento, including watershed hydrologic inventories and studies of water sources and supplies to meet local needs, flood control, water quality, seepage and erosion control, fishery restoration, and preservation of riparian habitat. The department shall submit the results of its studies and its recommendations to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1453, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Acquisition and Disposal of Property [250. - 260.]

250.

In the name of the people of the State of California, the department may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary for state water and dam purposes. The department shall not commence any such proceeding in eminent domain unless the project for which the property is being acquired has been authorized and funds are available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

Subject to Sections 1240.670 and 1240.680 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the real property which the department may acquire by eminent domain, or otherwise, includes any property dedicated to park purposes, however it may have been dedicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

The department may acquire, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, any real property which it considers necessary for state water and dam purposes. Real property for such purposes includes, but is not limited to, real property considered necessary for any of the following purposes:

(a) For rights of way.

(b) For the purposes of exchanging the same for other real property to be used for rights of way.

(c) For rock quarries, gravel pits, or sand or earth borrow pits.

(d) For offices, shops, or storage yards.

(e) For parks adjoining or near any state dam or water facility.

(f) For the culture and support of trees which benefit any state dam or water facility by aiding in the maintenance and preservation of the facility.

(g) For drainage in connection with any state dam or water facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2104.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

The director may execute all deeds or conveyances necessary to convey any real property or interest therein to be sold or exchanged under the provisions of this code. He may insert in any such deed or conveyance such conditions, covenants, exceptions and reservations as in his opinion are in the public interest or may convey in fee simple absolute. All statutes relating to state lands or to reservations of minerals therein or to reservations of rights to prospect for or mine or remove such minerals are inapplicable to lands heretofore or hereafter acquired by the State or conveyed by the State pursuant to the provisions of this code or pursuant to the provisions of previously existing statutes codified in this code, and no such statute in respect to state lands hereafter enacted shall be applicable thereto unless the Legislature expressly so declares.

It shall be conclusively presumed in favor of any purchaser for value and without notice of any real property or interest therein conveyed pursuant to the provisions of this code that the department acted within its lawful authority in acquiring the property, and that the director acted within his lawful authority in executing any deed or conveyance or lease authorized by this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2104.)
-------------------------------------------

258.

The authority conferred by this code to acquire real property for state dam and water purposes includes authority to acquire for future needs. The department is authorized to lease any lands which are held for state dam and water purposes and are not presently needed therefor on such terms and conditions as the director may fix and to maintain and care for such property in order to secure rent therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2104.)
-------------------------------------------

259.

When the department condemns the property of any common carrier railroad, other public utility, or state agency, or the appurtenances thereof, it shall be governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 11590) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

In any lease, easement, or right of entry agreement entered into whereby the department leases real property or obtains a grant of easement, right-of-way, or right of entry in real property for the purpose of exploration for, or construction, operation, or maintenance of, water projects, or for other investigations or data collection, the department may agree to indemnify and hold harmless the lessor or grantor and may agree to repair or pay for any damage caused by reason of the uses authorized by such lease, easement, right-of-way, or right of entry. Insurance may be purchased by the Department of General Services, upon request of the department, to protect the department against loss or expense arising out of such a lease, easement, right-of-way, or right of entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Construction Contracts [265. - 265.]

265.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the State Contract Act, the department may award and enter into construction contracts which require expenditures in excess of funds presently available therefor, but the obligation of the department and the State in such contracts shall be expressly contingent upon sufficient funds being made available by future appropriations or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2054.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proceedings to Prevent Waste or Unreasonable Use [275. - 275.]

275.

The department and board shall take all appropriate proceedings or actions before executive, legislative, or judicial agencies to prevent waste, unreasonable use, unreasonable method of use, or unreasonable method of diversion of water in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Habitat Restoration Contracts [290. - 290.]

290.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when undertaking a habitat restoration project where the department has available funds to carry out the project, the department may enter into contracts to accomplish the restoration pursuant to this section, the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code), and Section 65967 of the Government Code.

(b) Contracts may include the physical restoration of any state or privately owned real property, and any incidental or necessary services to accomplish that purpose. This may include, but is not limited to, the acquisition or sale of real property, including to the department, conducting environmental reviews, performance of design, securing
 any necessary permits, and ongoing monitoring or land management.

(c) Solicitations for a contract for habitat restoration issued by the department shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The department shall prepare a request for proposals in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) The request for proposals shall include all applicable terms and conditions that may apply to the habitat restoration project.

(3) The request for proposals shall include minimum requirements for any proposals, standards for competition, including the minimum number of proposals required, and the processes and procedures for the scoring, evaluation of proposals, and protests.

(d) Contracts entered into
 by the department shall provide compensation, including through progress payments, based upon measurable environmental outcomes and performance targets.

(e) Contracts entered into by the department that include work meeting the definition of a “public work” pursuant to Section 1720 of the Labor Code shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(f) In establishing the terms and conditions applicable for each project, the department shall classify the nature of the services to be provided. The department shall ensure that the contract includes necessary terms and conditions that are consistent with other applicable state contracts for each identified classification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 14, Sec. 10.   (SB 124)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Waste from Artesian Wells [300. - 311.]

300.

For the purposes of this article, an artesian well is any artifical hole made in the ground through which water naturally flows from subterranean sources to the surface of the ground for any length of time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

For the purposes of this article, waste is the causing, suffering, or permitting any water flowing from an artesian well, to run either:

(a) Into any natural watercourse or channel, or into any bay or pond, unless the water is used thereafter for irrigation or domestic use.

(b) Into any street, road, or highway.

(c) Upon the land of any person or upon the public land of the United States or of the State, unless it is used thereon for irrigation, domestic use, or the propagation of fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

The use of any water flowing from an artesian well for the irrigation of land, whenever over 5 per cent of the water received on the land for irrigation purposes is permitted to escape from the land, is waste within the meaning of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

Nothing in this article prevents the running of artesian water into an artificial pond or storage-reservoir, if the water is used thereafter for a beneficial use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

304.

A beneficial use under the next preceding section shall not exceed one tenth of one miner’s inch of water per acre, perpetual flow, but the person using the water may cumulate that amount within any period of each year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

305.

Any artesian well which is not capped or equipped with a mechanical appliance which will readily and effectively arrest and prevent the flow of any water from the well is a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

The owner, tenant, or occupant of the land upon which a well which is a public nuisance under the next preceding section is situated, who causes, permits, or suffers such public nuisance to exist or continue is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

Any person owning, possessing, or occupying any land upon which is situated an artesian well, who causes, suffers, or permits water unnecessarily to flow from the well or to go to waste is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

Each day’s continuance of waste constitutes a new offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article is punishable for each offense by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 405.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

All prosecutions for the violation of any of the provisions of this article shall be instituted in the superior court of the county where the well is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

Any fine imposed under the provisions of this article may be collected as in other criminal cases, and the justice may also issue an execution upon the judgment therein rendered, which may be enforced and collected as in civil cases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Yuba River Debris Control [340. - 342.]

340.

Any funds appropriated for Yuba River debris control shall be used for construction, renewal, and repair of works for restraining, impounding and control of debris resulting from mining operations, natural erosion and other causes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1958.)
-------------------------------------------

341.

Funds withdrawn from such appropriation must be matched by an expenditure of like amount by the Federal Government for the same work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1958.)
-------------------------------------------

342.

All work paid for from such appropriation shall be executed by or under the direction of the California Debris Commission, according to plans approved by the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1958.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Recreation [345. - 346.]

345.

The Department of Water Resources shall (a) plan recreation development associated with state-constructed water projects in consultation with local public agencies and affected state and federal agencies, (b) thereafter acquire land necessary to implement and execute plans for such development pursuant to specific legislative authorization. Such authorization shall specify to what extent, if any, the power of eminent domain may be used.

It is hereby declared to be the intention of the Legislature, in enacting this section, that no water resources development funds will be appropriated for the purpose of acquiring land for recreation development associated with state-constructed water projects, exclusive of land required for storage and conservation of water for such projects.

In carrying out its duties under this section, the Department of Water Resources may enter into contracts, leases, and agreements with other state agencies, the federal government, local public agencies, and persons; and the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Parks and Recreation and all other affected state and local agencies shall cooperate with the Department of Water Resources to that end.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------

346.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 345, the department, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may acquire by eminent domain or otherwise, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, any real property for recreational development associated with state-constructed water projects. Any funds, including but not limited to water resources development funds, heretofore or hereafter appropriated to the department for the acquisition of rights-of-way, easements, and property, may be used to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Atmospheric Rivers Research and Forecast Improvement Program: Enabling Climate Adaptation Through Forecast-Informed Reservoir Operations and Hazard Resiliency (AR/FIRO) [347. - 347.]

347.

(a) The Atmospheric Rivers Research and Forecast Improvement Program: Enabling Climate Adaptation Through Forecast-Informed Reservoir Operations and Hazard Resiliency (AR/FIRO) Program is hereby established in the Department of Water Resources.

(b) (1) The department shall research, develop, and implement new observations, prediction models, novel forecasting methods, and tailored decision support systems to improve predictions of atmospheric rivers and their impacts on water supply, flooding, post-wildfire debris flows, and environmental conditions.

(2) The department shall utilize all relevant information produced pursuant to paragraph (1) to operate reservoirs in a manner that improves flood protection in the state and to reoperate flood control and water storage facilities to capture water generated by atmospheric rivers and other storms. The goals of integrating forecast-informed reservoir operations into department operations shall be to increase water supply, hydropower availability, and water supply reliability. The department may use research generated by this program to refine climate projections of extreme weather and water events and changes in Sierra snow.

(3) Information produced pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be available to relevant federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 134, Sec. 4.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.7. Water Diversion and Use Reports [348. - 348.]

348.
